Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1031.01
Garnishment; judgment; effect.

The judgment in the garnishment action shall be conclusive between the garnishee, plaintiff, defendant, and any intervenor.

Laws 1951, c. 67, § 12, p. 206.

A specific holding, in a prior garnishment action by a creditor against a bank's insurer under a blanket employee dishonesty bond, that the bank did not suffer a loss within the coverage of such bond is res judicata in a subsequent suit brought by the bank to recover under the bond and cannot be relitigated. Bank of Mead v. St. Paul Fire & Marine Ins. Co., 202 Neb. 403, 275 N.W.2d 822 (1979).